Florida, session 2026, HB5201.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. All collective bargaining issues for which
negotiations have reached an impasse for the 2026-2027 fiscal
year between the State of Florida and the certified
representatives of the bargaining units for state employees
shall be resolved pursuant to instructions provided in the
General Appropriations Act and relevant provisions of any
legislation enacted to implement the General Appropriations Act
for the 2026-2027 fiscal year.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5201-00